Missouri, session 2026, HB1683.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.486, to read as follows:
1.486. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Anti-Red Flag
Gun Seizure Act".
2. As used in this section, "red flag law" means:
(1) Any gun control law, order, or measure that directs the temporary or
permanent seizure of any firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition of an individual,
except persons lawfully in custody or persons who have been released after the
execution of a bail bond after having been charged with a dangerous felony, as defined
in section 556.061; or
(2) Any federal statute, federal rule, federal executive order, or federal judicial
order or finding, or any state statute, state rule, state executive order, or state judicial
order or finding, that:
(a) Prohibits a Missouri resident from owning, possessing, transporting,
transferring, or receiving any firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition, except
persons lawfully in custody or persons who have been released after the execution of a
bail bond after having been charged with a dangerous felony, as defined in section
556.061; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1683 2
(b) Orders the removal or requires the surrender of any firearm, firearm
accessory, or ammunition of an individual, except persons lawfully in custody or persons
who have been released after the execution of a bail bond after having been charged
with a dangerous felony, as defined in section 556.061.
3. Any federal order of protection, other judicial order issued by a federal court,
or federal executive order that is a red flag law or otherwise directs the confiscation of
any firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition from any law-abiding citizen within the
borders of this state shall not be enforced in this state by any state agency, political
subdivision, or state or local law enforcement agency.
4. No state agency, political subdivision, or state or local law enforcement agency
shall receive any federal moneys for the purpose of enforcing any federal statute, federal
rule, federal executive order, or federal judicial order or findings, or for the purpose of
enforcing any state statute, state rule, state executive order, or state judicial order or
findings, that would have the effect of enforcing a red flag law against a Missouri
resident.
5. No state entity or employee thereof, political subdivision or employee thereof,
or other entity or person shall have the authority to enforce or attempt to enforce a red
flag law regardless of the red flag law's origin or the authority of the issuing entity. This
subsection shall not apply to any agent of the federal government enforcing a federal
law or federal order.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a firearm, firearm
accessory, or ammunition from being seized as evidence by law enforcement in the
course of an investigation.
7. (1) A political subdivision or state or local law enforcement agency that
employs a law enforcement officer who knowingly acts to violate this section and enforce
a red flag law under the color of any state or federal statute, rule, executive order, or
judicial order or finding shall be liable to the party against whom the red flag law was
enforced in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for redress and
shall be subject to a civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars per occurrence.
(2) Any person injured under this section shall have standing to pursue an action
for injunctive relief in the circuit court of the county in which the action allegedly
occurred or in the circuit court of Cole County.
(3) The court shall hold a hearing on any motion for a temporary restraining
order or preliminary injunction within thirty days of service of a petition for the same.
(4) In an action brought under this section by a party against whom the red flag
law was enforced, a court may order injunctive or other equitable relief, recovery of
damages, other legal remedies, and payment of reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and

HB 1683 3
expenses of the party. The relief and remedies set forth in this section shall not be
deemed exclusive and shall be in addition to any other relief or remedies permitted by
law. The court may award the prevailing party, if not the state of Missouri or a political
subdivision thereof, reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(5) Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative defense to any action brought
under this section.
✔